Utah statutes.
58-47b-305.   State and local jurisdiction.

(1) (a)  The division is the only agency authorized to license individuals to practice massage therapy within the state or any of its political subdivisions.

(b)  This chapter does not prevent any political subdivision of the state from enacting:

(i)  ordinances governing the operation of establishments offering massages; or

(ii)  ordinances regulating the practice of massage therapy, if the ordinances are not less stringent than this chapter.

(2)  This chapter does not prohibit any political subdivision of the state from prosecuting unlicensed individuals engaged in the practice of massage therapy or from prosecuting licensed individuals who are engaged in unlawful conduct.



Amended by Chapter 159, 1998 General Session

